Arkansas, session 2025, SB170.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 1-2-125 is repealed because the section has
expired.
1-2-125. Electronic document submissions and publications.
(a)(1) A state agency, a court, or a local government entity that is
required by law to accept, solicit, or publish any information, record,
report, application, or other required material may accept, solicit, or
publish the information, record, report, application, or other required
material in an electronic form.
(2) If a state agency, a court, or a local government entity
accepts, solicits, or publishes the information, record, report, application,
or other required material in an electronic form under subdivision (a)(1) of
this section, the state agency, the court, or the local government entity
shall also comply with existing requirements in law concerning the
acceptance, solicitation, or publication of information, records, reports,
applications, or other required materials.
(3) A state agency, a court, or a local government entity may
*JLL001*
01/31/2025 10:13:46 AM JLL001

SB170
require an electronic form of receipt verification of information, records,
reports, applications, or other required materials accepted, solicited, or
published in an electronic form.
(b) If as provided by this section, a state agency, a court, or a
local government entity decides to accept, solicit, or publish the
information, record, report, application, or other required material in an
electronic form, the state agency, the court, or the local government entity
shall:
(1) Notify the Legislative Council within thirty (30) days of
its decision and the justifications for the decision; and
(2) On or before the expiration date of this section, advise the
Legislative Council as to the sections of the Arkansas Code that should be
amended to allow indefinitely for the discretion to accept, solicit, or
publish the information, records, report, application, or other required
material in an electronic form.
(c) This section expires four (4) years after August 1, 2017.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. CONSTRUCTION AND LEGISLATIVE INTENT.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) The enactment and adoption of this act shall not expressly
or impliedly repeal an act passed during the regular session of the Ninety-
Fifth General Assembly;
(2) To the extent that a conflict exists between an act of the
regular session of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly and this act:
(A) The act of the regular session of the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly shall be treated as a subsequent act passed by the General
Assembly for the purposes of:
(i) Giving the act of the regular session of the
Ninety-Fifth General Assembly its full force and effect; and
(ii) Amending or repealing the appropriate parts of
the Arkansas Code of 1987; and
(B) Section 1-2-107 shall not apply; and
(3) This act shall make only technical, not substantive, changes
to the Arkansas Code of 1987.


01/31/2025 10:13:46 AM JLL001